Indiana, session 2026, HB1244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-21.2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "special fund" means:
(1) the special funds referred to in IC 6-1.1-39-5;
(2) the special funds referred to in IC 8-22-3.5-9(e);
(3) the allocation fund referred to in IC 36-7-14-39(b)(4);
IC 36-7-14-39(b)(5);
(4) the allocation fund referred to in IC 36-7-14.5-12.5(d);
(5) the special fund referred to in IC 36-7-15.1-26(b)(3);
(6) the special fund referred to in IC 36-7-15.1-53(b)(3);
(7) the allocation fund referred to in IC 36-7-30-25(b)(3); or
(8) the allocation fund referred to in IC 36-7-30.5-30(b)(3).
SECTION 2. IC 36-7-14-12.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 172, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.7. (a) Not later than December
1 each year, the redevelopment commissioners shall file with the
department of local government finance and with the unit's executive
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


and fiscal body a report setting out a spending plan for the next
calendar year describing planned expenditures. The spending plan must
be filed in the manner prescribed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) A redevelopment commission may use money from the
redevelopment commission's allocation fund described in section
39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter and any other fund maintained by the
redevelopment commission only for the purposes provided in the
annual spending plan described in subsection (a).
(c) The department of local government finance shall, before
February 1, 2025, and before February 1 of each year thereafter, submit
a report of the redevelopment commissions that failed to submit the
spending plan required under subsection (a) to the legislative services
agency for distribution to the members of the legislative council. The
report must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 3. IC 36-7-14-15.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 174, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.5. (a) This section applies to a
county having a population of more than two hundred fifty thousand
(250,000) and less than three hundred thousand (300,000).
(b) In adopting a declaratory resolution under section 15 of this
chapter, a redevelopment commission may include a provision stating
that the redevelopment project area is considered to include one (1) or
more additional areas outside the boundaries of the redevelopment
project area if the redevelopment commission makes the following
findings and the requirements of subsection (c) are met:
(1) One (1) or more taxpayers presently located within the
boundaries of the redevelopment project area are expected within
one (1) year to relocate all or part of their operations outside the
boundaries of the redevelopment project area and have expressed
an interest in relocating all or part of their operations within the
boundaries of an additional area.
(2) The relocation described in subdivision (1) will contribute to
the continuation of the conditions described in IC 36-7-1-3 in the
redevelopment project area.
(3) For purposes of this section, it will be of public utility and
benefit to include the additional areas as part of the
redevelopment project area.
(c) Each additional area must be designated by the redevelopment
commission as a redevelopment project area or an economic
development area under this chapter.
(d) Notwithstanding section 3 of this chapter, the additional areas
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


shall be considered to be a part of the redevelopment special taxing
district under the jurisdiction of the redevelopment commission. Any
excess property taxes that the commission has determined may be paid
to taxing units under section 39(b)(5) 39(b)(6) of this chapter shall be
paid to the taxing units from which the excess property taxes were
derived. All powers of the redevelopment commission authorized under
this chapter may be exercised by the redevelopment commission in
additional areas under its jurisdiction.
(e) The declaratory resolution must include a statement of the
general boundaries of each additional area. However, it is sufficient to
describe those boundaries by location in relation to public ways,
streams, or otherwise, as determined by the commissioners.
(f) The declaratory resolution may include a provision with respect
to the allocation and distribution of property taxes with respect to one
(1) or more of the additional areas in the manner provided in section 39
of this chapter. If the redevelopment commission includes such a
provision in the resolution, allocation areas in the redevelopment
project area and in the additional areas considered to be part of the
redevelopment project area shall be considered a single allocation area
for purposes of this chapter.
(g) The additional areas must be located within the same county as
the redevelopment project area but are not otherwise required to be
within the jurisdiction of the redevelopment commission, if the
redevelopment commission obtains the consent by ordinance of:
(1) the county legislative body, for each additional area located
within the unincorporated part of the county; or
(2) the legislative body of the city or town affected, for each
additional area located within a city or town.
In granting its consent, the legislative body shall approve the plan of
development or redevelopment relating to the additional area.
(h) A declaratory resolution previously adopted may be amended to
include a provision to include additional areas as set forth in this
section and an allocation provision under section 39 of this chapter
with respect to one (1) or more of the additional areas in accordance
with sections 15, 16, and 17 of this chapter.
(i) The redevelopment commission may amend the allocation
provision of a declaratory resolution in accordance with sections 15,
16, and 17 of this chapter to change the assessment date that
determines the base assessed value of property in the allocation area to
any assessment date following the effective date of the allocation
provision of the declaratory resolution. Such a change may relate to the
assessment date that determines the base assessed value of that portion
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


of the allocation area that is located in the redevelopment project area
alone, that portion of the allocation area that is located in an additional
area alone, or the entire allocation area.
SECTION 4. IC 36-7-14-25.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 176, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25.1. (a) In addition to other
methods of raising money for property acquisition or redevelopment in
a redevelopment project area, and in anticipation of the special tax to
be levied under section 27 of this chapter, the taxes allocated under
section 39 of this chapter, or other revenues of the district, or any
combination of these sources, the redevelopment commission may, by
bond resolution and subject to subsections (c) and (p), issue the bonds
of the special taxing district in the name of the unit. The amount of the
bonds may not exceed the total, as estimated by the commission, of all
expenses reasonably incurred in connection with the acquisition and
redevelopment of the property, including:
(1) the total cost of all land, rights-of-way, and other property to
be acquired and redeveloped;
(2) all reasonable and necessary architectural, engineering, legal,
financing, accounting, advertising, bond discount, and
supervisory expenses related to the acquisition and redevelopment
of the property or the issuance of bonds;
(3) capitalized interest permitted by this chapter and a debt
service reserve for the bonds to the extent the redevelopment
commission determines that a reserve is reasonably required; and
(4) expenses that the redevelopment commission is required or
permitted to pay under IC 8-23-17.
(b) If the redevelopment commission plans to acquire different
parcels of land or let different contracts for redevelopment work at
approximately the same time, whether under one (1) or more
resolutions, the commission may provide for the total cost in one (1)
issue of bonds.
(c) The legislative body of the unit must adopt a resolution that
specifies the public purpose of the bond, the use of the bond proceeds,
the maximum principal amount of the bond, the term of the bond, and
the maximum interest rate or rates of the bond, any provision for
redemption before maturity, and any provision for the payment of
capitalized interest. The bonds must be dated as set forth in the bond
resolution and negotiable, subject to the requirements of the bond
resolution for registering the bonds. The resolution authorizing the
bonds must state:
(1) the denominations of the bonds;
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(2) the place or places at which the bonds are payable; and
(3) the term of the bonds, which may not exceed:
(A) fifty (50) years, for bonds issued before July 1, 2008;
(B) thirty (30) years, for bonds issued after June 30, 2008, to
finance:
(i) an integrated coal gasification powerplant (as defined in
IC 6-3.1-29-6);
(ii) a part of an integrated coal gasification powerplant (as
defined in IC 6-3.1-29-6); or
(iii) property used in the operation or maintenance of an
integrated coal gasification powerplant (as defined in
IC 6-3.1-29-6);
that received a certificate of public convenience and necessity
from the Indiana utility regulatory commission under
IC 8-1-8.5 et seq. before July 1, 2008;
(C) thirty-five (35) years, for bonds issued after June 30, 2019,
to finance a project that is located in a redevelopment project
area, an economic development area, or an urban renewal
project area and that includes, as part of the project, the use
and repurposing of two (2) or more buildings and structures
that are:
(i) at least seventy-five (75) years old; and
(ii) located at a site at which manufacturing previously
occurred over a period of at least seventy-five (75) years; or
(D) twenty-five (25) years, for bonds issued after June 30,
2008, that are not described in clause (B) or (C).
The bond resolution may also state that the bonds are redeemable
before maturity with or without a premium, as determined by the
redevelopment commission.
(d) The redevelopment commission shall certify a copy of the
resolution authorizing the bonds to the municipal or county fiscal
officer, who shall then prepare the bonds, subject to subsections (c) and
(p). The seal of the unit must be impressed on the bonds, or a facsimile
of the seal must be printed on the bonds.
(e) The bonds must be executed by the appropriate officer of the
unit and attested by the municipal or county fiscal officer.
(f) The bonds are exempt from taxation for all purposes.
(g) The municipal or county fiscal officer shall give notice of the
sale of the bonds by publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1. The
municipal fiscal officer, or county fiscal officer or executive, shall sell
the bonds to the highest bidder, but may not sell them for less than
ninety-seven percent (97%) of their par value. However, bonds payable
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


solely or in part from tax proceeds allocated under section 39(b)(4)
39(b)(5) of this chapter, or other revenues of the district may be sold
at a private negotiated sale.
(h) Except as provided in subsection (i), a redevelopment
commission may not issue the bonds when the total issue, including
bonds already issued and to be issued, exceeds two percent (2%) of the
adjusted value of the taxable property in the special taxing district, as
determined under IC 36-1-15.
(i) The bonds are not a corporate obligation of the unit but are an
indebtedness of the taxing district. The bonds and interest are payable,
as set forth in the bond resolution of the redevelopment commission:
(1) from a special tax levied upon all of the property in the taxing
district, as provided by section 27 of this chapter;
(2) from the tax proceeds allocated under section 39(b)(4)
39(b)(5) of this chapter;
(3) from other revenues available to the redevelopment
commission; or
(4) from a combination of the methods stated in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
If the bonds are payable solely from the tax proceeds allocated under
section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter, other revenues of the
redevelopment commission, or any combination of these sources, they
may be issued in any amount not to exceed the maximum amount
approved by the legislative body in the resolution described in
subsection (c).
(j) Proceeds from the sale of bonds may be used to pay the cost of
interest on the bonds for a period not to exceed five (5) years from the
date of issuance.
(k) All laws relating to the giving of notice of the issuance of bonds,
the giving of notice of a hearing on the appropriation of the proceeds
of the bonds, the right of taxpayers to appear and be heard on the
proposed appropriation, and the approval of the appropriation by the
department of local government finance apply to all bonds issued under
this chapter that are payable from the special benefits tax levied
pursuant to section 27 of this chapter or from taxes allocated under
section 39 of this chapter.
(l) All laws relating to:
(1) the filing of petitions requesting the issuance of bonds; and
(2) the right of:
(A) taxpayers and voters to remonstrate against the issuance of
bonds in the case of a proposed bond issue described by
IC 6-1.1-20-3.1(a); or
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(B) voters to vote on the issuance of bonds in the case of a
proposed bond issue described by IC 6-1.1-20-3.5(a);
apply to bonds issued under this chapter except for bonds payable
solely from tax proceeds allocated under section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of
this chapter, other revenues of the redevelopment commission, or any
combination of these sources.
(m) If a debt service reserve is created from the proceeds of bonds,
the debt service reserve may be used to pay principal and interest on
the bonds as provided in the bond resolution.
(n) Any amount remaining in the debt service reserve after all of the
bonds of the issue for which the debt service reserve was established
have matured shall be:
(1) deposited in the allocation fund established under section
39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter; and
(2) to the extent permitted by law, transferred to the county or
municipality that established the department of redevelopment for
use in reducing the county's or municipality's property tax levies
for debt service.
(o) If bonds are issued under this chapter that are payable solely or
in part from revenues to the redevelopment commission from a project
or projects, the redevelopment commission may adopt a resolution or
trust indenture or enter into covenants as is customary in the issuance
of revenue bonds. The resolution or trust indenture may pledge or
assign the revenues from the project or projects, but may not convey or
mortgage any project or parts of a project. The resolution or trust
indenture may also contain any provisions for protecting and enforcing
the rights and remedies of the bond owners as may be reasonable and
proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the
duties of the redevelopment commission. The redevelopment
commission may establish fees and charges for the use of any project
and covenant with the owners of any bonds to set those fees and
charges at a rate sufficient to protect the interest of the owners of the
bonds. Any revenue bonds issued by the redevelopment commission
that are payable solely from revenues of the commission shall contain
a statement to that effect in the form of bond.
(p) If the total principal amount of bonds authorized by a resolution
of the redevelopment commission adopted before July 1, 2008, is equal
to or greater than three million dollars ($3,000,000), the bonds may not
be issued without the approval, by resolution, of the legislative body of
the unit. Bonds authorized in any principal amount by a resolution of
the redevelopment commission adopted after June 30, 2008, may not
be issued without the approval of the legislative body of the unit.
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


SECTION 5. IC 36-7-14-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 177, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) All proceeds from the sale
of bonds under section 25.1 of this chapter shall be kept as a separate
and specific fund to pay the expenses incurred in connection with the
acquisition and redevelopment of property. The fund shall be known as
the redevelopment district capital fund. Any surplus of funds remaining
after all expenses are paid shall be paid into and become a part of the
redevelopment district bond fund established under section 27 of this
chapter.
(b) All gifts or donations that are given or paid to the department of
redevelopment or to the unit for redevelopment purposes shall be
promptly deposited to the credit of the redevelopment district capital
fund. The redevelopment commission may use these gifts and
donations for the purposes of this chapter.
(c) Before the eleventh day of each calendar month the fiscal officer
shall notify the redevelopment commission and the officers of the unit
who have duties in respect to the funds and accounts of the unit of the
amount standing to the credit of the redevelopment district capital fund
at the close of business on the last day of the preceding month.
(d) A redevelopment commission shall deposit in the allocation fund
established under section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter of an
allocation area the proceeds from the sale or leasing of property in the
area under section 22 of this chapter if:
(1) there are outstanding bonds that were issued to pay costs of
redevelopment in the allocation area; and
(2) the bonds are payable solely or in part from tax proceeds
allocated under section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 36-7-14-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 178, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies only to:
(1) bonds that are issued under section 25.1 of this chapter; and
(2) leases entered into under section 25.2 of this chapter;
which are payable from a special tax levied upon all of the property in
the special taxing district. This section does not apply to bonds or
leases that are payable solely from tax proceeds allocated under section
39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter, other revenues of the redevelopment
commission, or any combination of these sources.
(b) The redevelopment commission, with the prior approval of the
legislative body, shall levy each year a special tax on all of the property
of the redevelopment taxing district, in such a manner as to meet and
pay the principal of the bonds as they mature, together with all accruing
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


interest on the bonds or lease rental payments under section 25.2 of this
chapter. The commission shall cause the tax levied to be certified to the
proper officers as other tax levies are certified, and to the auditor of the
county in which the redevelopment district is located, before the
second day of October in each year. The tax shall be estimated and
entered on the tax duplicate by the county auditor and shall be collected
and enforced by the county treasurer in the same manner as other state
and county taxes are estimated, entered, collected, and enforced. The
amount of the tax levied to pay bonds or lease rentals payable from the
tax levied under this section shall be reduced by any amount available
in the allocation fund established under section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of
this chapter or other revenues of the redevelopment commission to the
extent such revenues have been set aside in the redevelopment bond
fund.
(c) As the tax is collected, it shall be accumulated in a separate fund
to be known as the redevelopment district bond fund and shall be
applied to the payment of the bonds as they mature and the interest on
the bonds as it accrues, or to make lease payments and to no other
purpose. All accumulations of the fund before their use for the payment
of bonds and interest or to make lease payments shall be deposited with
the depository or depositories for other public funds of the unit in
accordance with IC 5-13, unless they are invested under IC 5-13-9.
(d) If there are no outstanding bonds that are payable solely or in
part from tax proceeds allocated under section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this
chapter and that were issued to pay costs of redevelopment in an
allocation area that is located wholly or in part in the special taxing
district, then all proceeds from the sale or leasing of property in the
allocation area under section 22 of this chapter shall be paid into the
redevelopment district bond fund and become a part of that fund. In
arriving at the tax levy for any year, the redevelopment commission
shall take into account the amount of the proceeds deposited under this
subsection and remaining on hand.
(e) The tax levies provided for in this section are reviewable by
other bodies vested by law with the authority to ascertain that the levies
are sufficient to raise the amount that, with other amounts available, is
sufficient to meet the payments under the lease payable from the levy
of taxes.
SECTION 7. IC 36-7-14-39, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. (a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a declaratory resolution adopted
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


under section 15 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and
allocation of property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j), the
following:
(1) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1995, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing an economic development area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(2) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1997, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, as finally determined for the current assessment date.
(3) If:
(A) an allocation provision adopted before June 30, 1995, in
a declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area expires
after June 30, 1997; and
(B) after June 30, 1997, a new allocation provision is included
in an amendment to the declaratory resolution;
the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined for
the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of
the allocation provision adopted after June 30, 1997, as adjusted
under subsection (h).
(4) Except as provided in subdivision (5), for all other allocation
areas, the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h).
(5) If an allocation area established in an economic development
area before July 1, 1995, is expanded after June 30, 1995, the
definition in subdivision (1) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1995.
(6) If an allocation area established in a redevelopment project
area before July 1, 1997, is expanded after June 30, 1997, the
definition in subdivision (2) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1997.
Except as provided in section 39.3 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property. However, upon
approval by a resolution of the redevelopment commission adopted
before June 1, 1987, "property taxes" also includes taxes imposed
under IC 6-1.1 on depreciable personal property. If a redevelopment
commission adopted before June 1, 1987, a resolution to include within
the definition of property taxes, taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on
depreciable personal property that has a useful life in excess of eight
(8) years, the commission may by resolution determine the percentage
of taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property
that will be included within the definition of property taxes. However,
the percentage included must not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of
the taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 15 of this chapter
on or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i)
may include a provision with respect to the allocation and distribution
of property taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this
section. A declaratory resolution previously adopted may include an
allocation provision by the amendment of that declaratory resolution on
or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) in
accordance with the procedures required for its original adoption. A
declaratory resolution or amendment that establishes an allocation
provision must include a specific finding of fact, supported by
evidence, that the adoption of the allocation provision will result in
new property taxes in the area that would not have been generated but
for the adoption of the allocation provision. For an allocation area
established before July 1, 1995, the expiration date of any allocation
provisions for the allocation area is June 30, 2025, or the last date of
any obligations that are outstanding on July 1, 2015, whichever is later.
A declaratory resolution or an amendment that establishes an allocation
provision after June 30, 1995, must specify an expiration date for the
allocation provision. For an allocation area established before July 1,
2008, the expiration date may not be more than thirty (30) years after
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


the date on which the allocation provision is established. For an
allocation area established after June 30, 2008, the expiration date may
not be more than twenty-five (25) years after the date on which the first
obligation was incurred to pay principal and interest on bonds or lease
rentals on leases payable from tax increment revenues. However, with
respect to bonds or other obligations that were issued before July 1,
2008, if any of the bonds or other obligations that were scheduled when
issued to mature before the specified expiration date and that are
payable only from allocated tax proceeds with respect to the allocation
area remain outstanding as of the expiration date, the allocation
provision does not expire until all of the bonds or other obligations are
no longer outstanding. Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of an
allocation area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is
located in a redevelopment project area described in section
25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, an economic development area described
in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban renewal project
area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, the expiration
date of the allocation provision may not be more than thirty-five (35)
years after the date on which the allocation provision is established.
The allocation provision may apply to all or part of the redevelopment
project area. The allocation provision must require that any property
taxes subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body
entitled to a distribution of property taxes on taxable property in the
allocation area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) This subdivision applies to a fire protection territory
established after December 31, 2022. If a unit becomes a
participating unit of a fire protection territory that is established
after a declaratory resolution is adopted under section 15 of this
chapter, the excess of the proceeds of the property taxes
attributable to an increase in the property tax rate for the
participating unit of a fire protection territory:
(A) except as otherwise provided by this subdivision, shall be
determined as follows:
STEP ONE: Divide the unit's tax rate for fire protection for
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


the year before the establishment of the fire protection
territory by the participating unit's tax rate as part of the fire
protection territory.
STEP TWO: Subtract the STEP ONE amount from one (1).
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO amount by the
allocated property tax attributable to the participating unit of
the fire protection territory; and
(B) to the extent not otherwise included in subdivisions (1)
and (3), the amount determined under STEP THREE of clause
(A) shall be allocated to and distributed in the form of an
allocated property tax revenue pass back to the participating
unit of the fire protection territory for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation is made.
However, if the redevelopment commission determines that it is
unable to meet its debt service obligations with regards to the
allocation area without all or part of the allocated property tax
revenue pass back to the participating unit of a fire protection area
under this subdivision, then the allocated property tax revenue
pass back under this subdivision shall be reduced by the amount
necessary for the redevelopment commission to meet its debt
service obligations of the allocation area. The calculation under
this subdivision must be made by the redevelopment commission
in collaboration with the county auditor and the applicable fire
protection territory. Any calculation determined according to
clause (A) must be submitted to the department of local
government finance in the manner prescribed by the department
of local government finance. The department of local government
finance shall verify the accuracy of each calculation.
(3) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivisions (1) and (2) shall be allocated to and, when
collected, paid into the funds of the taxing unit for which the
referendum or local public question was conducted.
(4) This subdivision applies to an allocation area established
after June 30, 2026. Of the property tax proceeds in excess of
those described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3), and before the
proceeds may be used for the purposes in subdivision (5), at
least ten percent (10%) of the property tax proceeds shall be
allocated to and, when collected, distributed according to the
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


following:
(A) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each school
corporation with territory in the allocation area.
(B) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each library
located in the allocation area.
(C) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each taxing
unit that provides police services, fire protection,
emergency medical service, or public safety services in the
allocation area.
Money allocated under this subdivision may be used for
operating or capital expenditures required for providing
services in the allocation area. If an entity described in clause
(A) through (C) does not exist for a particular allocation area,
the corresponding amount that would have been allocated
under the applicable clause shall instead be evenly divided
among the entities described in the remaining clauses.
(4) (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1), (2), and
(3), and (4) shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and,
when collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation
area that may be used by the redevelopment district only to do one
(1) or more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds which are incurred
by the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 27 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
unit to pay for local public improvements that are physically
located in or physically connected to that allocation area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 25.2 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the unit for expenditures made by it for local
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items described in section 25.1(a) of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to that allocation area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) For property taxes first due and payable before January 1,
2009, pay all or a part of a property tax replacement credit to
taxpayers in an allocation area as determined by the
redevelopment commission. This credit equals the amount
determined under the following STEPS for each taxpayer in a
taxing district (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-20) that contains all or
part of the allocation area:
STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
under IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2),
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(3), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(4), and
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is attributable to
the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(i) that part of each county's eligible property tax
replacement amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its
repeal)) for that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4
(before its repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district;
by
(ii) the STEP ONE sum.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(i) the STEP TWO quotient; times
(ii) the total amount of the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its repeal)) levied in the taxing district
that have been allocated during that year to an allocation
fund under this section.
If not all the taxpayers in an allocation area receive the credit
in full, each taxpayer in the allocation area is entitled to
receive the same proportion of the credit. A taxpayer may not
receive a credit under this section and a credit under section
39.5 of this chapter (before its repeal) in the same year.
(J) Pay expenses incurred by the redevelopment commission
for local public improvements that are in the allocation area or
serving the allocation area. Public improvements include
buildings, parking facilities, and other items described in
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


section 25.1(a) of this chapter.
(K) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
(L) Pay the costs of carrying out an eligible efficiency project
(as defined in IC 36-9-41-1.5) within the unit that established
the redevelopment commission. However, property tax
proceeds may be used under this clause to pay the costs of
carrying out an eligible efficiency project only if those
property tax proceeds exceed the amount necessary to do the
following:
(i) Make, when due, any payments required under clauses
(A) through (K), including any payments of principal and
interest on bonds and other obligations payable under this
subdivision, any payments of premiums under this
subdivision on the redemption before maturity of bonds, and
any payments on leases payable under this subdivision.
(ii) Make any reimbursements required under this
subdivision.
(iii) Pay any expenses required under this subdivision.
(iv) Establish, augment, or restore any debt service reserve
under this subdivision.
(M) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 12.2(a)(27) of this chapter.
(N) Expend revenues that are allocated for police and fire
services on both capital expenditures and operating expenses
as authorized in section 12.2(a)(28) of this chapter.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(5) (6) Except as provided in subsection (g), before June 15 of
each year, the commission shall do the following:
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to produce the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (4), (5),
plus the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4) (5) and the amount described in subsection
(l).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the county or municipality that established the
department of redevelopment, and the officers who are
authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly
or partly located within the allocation area. The county auditor,
upon receiving the notice, shall forward this notice (in an
electronic format) to the department of local government
finance not later than June 15 of each year. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
of assessed value to the respective taxing units under this
subdivision if to do so would endanger the interests of the
holders of bonds described in subdivision (4) (5) or lessors
under section 25.3 of this chapter.
(C) If:
(i) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest
payments on bonds described in subdivision (4); (5); plus
(ii) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4); (5);
the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


its determination of the excess assessed value that the
commission proposes to allocate to the respective taxing units
in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1). The legislative
body of the unit may approve the commission's determination
or modify the amount of the excess assessed value that will be
allocated to the respective taxing units in the manner
prescribed in subdivision (1).
(6) (7) Notwithstanding subdivision (5), (6), in the case of an
allocation area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is
located in a redevelopment project area described in section
25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, an economic development area
described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban
renewal project area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this
chapter, for each year the allocation provision is in effect, if the
amount of excess assessed value determined by the commission
under subdivision (5)(A) (6)(A) is expected to generate more than
two hundred percent (200%) of:
(A) the amount of allocated tax proceeds necessary to make,
when due, principal and interest payments on bonds described
in subdivision (4) (5) for the project; plus
(B) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4) (5) for the project; plus
(C) the amount necessary for the purpose described in
subsection (l);
the amount of the excess assessed value that generates more than
two hundred percent (200%) of the amounts described in clauses
(A), and (B), and (C) shall be allocated to the respective taxing
units in the manner prescribed by subdivision (1).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) may, subject to subsection (b)(5), (b)(6),
be irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(4). (b)(5).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the redevelopment commission, reassess the taxable
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


property situated upon or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective
on the next assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) shall establish an allocation fund for the
purposes specified in subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) and a special zone fund.
Such a unit shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period,
deposit each year in the special zone fund any amount in the allocation
fund derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those described
in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) from property located in the
enterprise zone that exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) for the year. The amount sufficient
for purposes specified in subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) for the year shall be
determined based on the pro rata portion of such current property tax
proceeds from the part of the enterprise zone that is within the
allocation area as compared to all such current property tax proceeds
derived from the allocation area. A unit that has no obligations, bonds,
or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(4)
(b)(5) shall establish a special zone fund and deposit all the property
tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2),
and (b)(3) in the fund derived from property tax proceeds in excess of
those described in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) from property
located in the enterprise zone. The unit that creates the special zone
fund shall use the fund (based on the recommendations of the urban
enterprise association) for programs in job training, job enrichment,
and basic skill development that are designed to benefit residents and
employers in the enterprise zone or other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(4), (b)(5), except that where reference is made in
subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) to allocation area it shall refer for purposes of
payments from the special zone fund only to that part of the allocation
area that is also located in the enterprise zone. Those programs shall
reserve at least one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any session for
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


residents of the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment in an area under a reassessment plan prepared
under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the base assessed value one (1) time to neutralize any effect of
the reassessment of the real property in the area on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the annual adjustment on the property
tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
However, the adjustments under this subsection:
(1) may not include the effect of phasing in assessed value due to
property tax abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1;
(2) may not produce less property tax proceeds allocable to the
redevelopment district under subsection (b)(4) (b)(5) than would
otherwise have been received if the reassessment under the
reassessment plan or the annual adjustment had not occurred; and
(3) may decrease base assessed value only to the extent that
assessed values in the allocation area have been decreased due to
annual adjustments or the reassessment under the reassessment
plan.
Assessed value increases attributable to the application of an abatement
schedule under IC 6-1.1-12.1 may not be included in the base assessed
value of an allocation area. The department of local government
finance may prescribe procedures for county and township officials to
follow to assist the department in making the adjustments.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If a redevelopment commission adopts a declaratory resolution
or an amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the redevelopment commission makes either of the
filings required under section 17(e) of this chapter after the first
anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor
of the county in which the unit is located shall compute the base
assessed value for the allocation area using the assessment date
immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2025,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system.
(l) This subsection applies to an allocation area established
before July 1, 2026. Of the property tax proceeds in excess of those
described in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3), plus the amount
of property tax proceeds necessary to make, when due, principal
and interest payments on bonds described in subsection (b)(5) in
each year, at least ten percent (10%) of the excess property tax
proceeds shall be allocated to and, when collected, distributed
according to the following:
(1) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each school
corporation with territory in the allocation area.
(2) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each library
located in the allocation area.
(3) One-third (1/3) shall be allocated among each taxing unit
that provides police services, fire protection, emergency
medical service, or public safety services in the allocation
area.
Money allocated under this subsection may be used for operating
or capital expenditures required for providing services in the
allocation area. If an entity described in subdivisions (1) through
(3) does not exist for a particular allocation area, the
corresponding amount that would have been allocated under the
applicable subdivision shall instead be evenly divided among the
entities described in the remaining subdivisions.
SECTION 8. IC 36-7-14-48, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


SECTION 180, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 48. (a) Notwithstanding section
39(a) of this chapter, with respect to the allocation and distribution of
property taxes for the accomplishment of a program adopted under
section 45 of this chapter, "base assessed value" means, subject to
section 39(j) of this chapter, the net assessed value of all of the
property, other than personal property, as finally determined for the
assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of the
allocation provision, as adjusted under section 39(h) of this chapter.
(b) The allocation fund established under section 39(b) of this
chapter for the allocation area for a program adopted under section 45
of this chapter may be used only for purposes related to the
accomplishment of the program, including the following:
(1) The construction, rehabilitation, or repair of residential units
within the allocation area.
(2) The construction, reconstruction, or repair of any
infrastructure (including streets, sidewalks, and sewers) within or
serving the allocation area.
(3) The acquisition of real property and interests in real property
within the allocation area.
(4) The demolition of real property within the allocation area.
(5) The provision of financial assistance to enable individuals and
families to purchase or lease residential units within the allocation
area. However, financial assistance may be provided only to those
individuals and families whose income is at or below the county's
median income for individuals and families, respectively.
(6) The provision of financial assistance to neighborhood
development corporations to permit them to provide financial
assistance for the purposes described in subdivision (5).
(7) For property taxes first due and payable before January 1,
2009, providing each taxpayer in the allocation area a credit for
property tax replacement as determined under subsections (c) and
(d). However, the commission may provide this credit only if the
municipal legislative body (in the case of a redevelopment
commission established by a municipality) or the county
executive (in the case of a redevelopment commission established
by a county) establishes the credit by ordinance adopted in the
year before the year in which the credit is provided.
(c) The maximum credit that may be provided under subsection
(b)(7) to a taxpayer in a taxing district that contains all or part of an
allocation area established for a program adopted under section 45 of
this chapter shall be determined as follows:
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
described in IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A) and IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2)
through IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is
attributable to the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(A) that part of each county's eligible property tax replacement
amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2) (before its repeal) for
that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4(a)(1) (before its
repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district; by
(B) the amount determined under STEP ONE.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(A) the STEP TWO quotient; by
(B) the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2) (before
its repeal) levied in the taxing district allocated to the
allocation fund, including the amount that would have been
allocated but for the credit.
(d) The commission may determine to grant to taxpayers in an
allocation area from its allocation fund a credit under this section, as
calculated under subsection (c). Except as provided in subsection (g),
one-half (1/2) of the credit shall be applied to each installment of taxes
(as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2) (before its repeal) that under
IC 6-1.1-22-9 are due and payable in a year. The commission must
provide for the credit annually by a resolution and must find in the
resolution the following:
(1) That the money to be collected and deposited in the allocation
fund, based upon historical collection rates, after granting the
credit will equal the amounts payable for contractual obligations
from the fund, plus ten percent (10%) of those amounts.
(2) If bonds payable from the fund are outstanding, that there is
a debt service reserve for the bonds that at least equals the amount
of the credit to be granted.
(3) If bonds of a lessor under section 25.2 of this chapter or under
IC 36-1-10 are outstanding and if lease rentals are payable from
the fund, that there is a debt service reserve for those bonds that
at least equals the amount of the credit to be granted.
If the tax increment is insufficient to grant the credit in full, the
commission may grant the credit in part, prorated among all taxpayers.
(e) Notwithstanding section 39(b) of this chapter, the allocation
fund established under section 39(b) of this chapter for the allocation
area for a program adopted under section 45 of this chapter may only
be used to do one (1) or more of the following:
(1) Accomplish one (1) or more of the actions set forth in section
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


39(b)(4)(A) 39(b)(5)(A) through 39(b)(4)(H) 39(b)(5)(H) and
39(b)(4)(J) 39(b)(5)(J) of this chapter for property that is
residential in nature.
(2) Reimburse the county or municipality for expenditures made
by the county or municipality in order to accomplish the housing
program in that allocation area.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(f) Notwithstanding section 39(b) of this chapter, the commission
shall, relative to the allocation fund established under section 39(b) of
this chapter for an allocation area for a program adopted under section
45 of this chapter, do the following before June 15 of each year:
(1) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value of
the taxable property in the allocation area for the most recent
assessment date minus the base assessed value, when multiplied
by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will exceed the
amount of assessed value needed to produce the property taxes
necessary to:
(A) make the distribution required under section 39(b)(2) and
39(b)(3) of this chapter;
(B) make, when due, principal and interest payments on bonds
described in section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter;
(C) pay the amount necessary for other purposes described in
section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter; and
(D) reimburse the county or municipality for anticipated
expenditures described in subsection (e)(2).
(2) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal body
of the county or municipality that established the department of
redevelopment, and the officers who are authorized to fix budgets,
tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other
taxing units that is wholly or partly located within the allocation
area. The county auditor, upon receiving the notice, shall forward
this notice (in an electronic format) to the department of local
government finance not later than June 15 of each year. The
notice must:
(A) state the amount, if any, of excess property taxes that the
commission has determined may be paid to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in section 39(b)(1) of
this chapter; or
(B) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units the
amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission.
(3) If:
(A) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest payments
on bonds described in subdivision (1); plus
(B) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (1);
the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit its
determination of the excess assessed value that the commission
proposes to allocate to the respective taxing units in the manner
prescribed in subdivision (2). The legislative body of the unit may
approve the commission's determination or modify the amount of
the excess assessed value that will be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (2).
(g) This subsection applies to an allocation area only to the extent
that the net assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government finance
is not included in the base assessed value. If property tax installments
with respect to a homestead (as defined in IC 6-1.1-12-37) are due in
installments established by the department of local government finance
under IC 6-1.1-22-9.5, each taxpayer subject to those installments in an
allocation area is entitled to an additional credit under subsection (d)
for the taxes (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2) (before its repeal) due in
installments. The credit shall be applied in the same proportion to each
installment of taxes (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2) (before its repeal).
SECTION 9. IC 36-7-14-52, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 181, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 52. (a) Notwithstanding section
39(a) of this chapter, with respect to the allocation and distribution of
property taxes for the accomplishment of the purposes of an
age-restricted housing program adopted under section 49 of this
chapter, "base assessed value" means, subject to section 39(j) of this
chapter, the net assessed value of all of the property, other than
personal property, as finally determined for the assessment date
immediately preceding the effective date of the allocation provision, as
adjusted under section 39(h) of this chapter.
(b) The allocation fund established under section 39(b) of this
chapter for the allocation area for an age-restricted housing program
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


adopted under section 49 of this chapter may be used only for purposes
related to the accomplishment of the purposes of the program,
including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The construction of any infrastructure (including streets,
sidewalks, and sewers) or local public improvements in, serving,
or benefiting the allocation area.
(2) The acquisition of real property and interests in real property
within the allocation area.
(3) The preparation of real property in anticipation of
development of the real property within the allocation area.
(4) To do any of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds or any other
obligations payable from allocated tax proceeds in the
allocation area that are incurred by the redevelopment district
for the purpose of financing or refinancing the age-restricted
housing program established under section 49 of this chapter
for the allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
the allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in the allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 27 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
unit to pay for local public improvements that are physically
located in or physically connected to the allocation area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in the
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in the allocation area under section 25.2 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the unit for expenditures made by the unit for
local public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items described in section 25.1(a) of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to the allocation area.
(c) Notwithstanding section 39(b) of this chapter, the commission
shall, relative to the allocation fund established under section 39(b) of
this chapter for an allocation area for an age-restricted housing program
adopted under section 49 of this chapter, do the following before June
15 of each year:
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(1) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value of
the taxable property in the allocation area for the most recent
assessment date minus the base assessed value, when multiplied
by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will exceed the
amount of assessed value needed to produce the property taxes
necessary to:
(A) make the distribution required under section 39(b)(2) and
39(b)(3) of this chapter;
(B) make, when due, principal and interest payments on bonds
described in section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter;
(C) pay the amount necessary for other purposes described in
section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter; and
(D) reimburse the county or municipality for anticipated
expenditures described in subsection (b)(2).
(2) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal body
of the county or municipality that established the department of
redevelopment, and the officers who are authorized to fix budgets,
tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other
taxing units that is wholly or partly located within the allocation
area. The county auditor, upon receiving the notice, shall forward
this notice (in an electronic format) to the department of local
government finance not later than June 15 of each year. The
notice must:
(A) state the amount, if any, of excess property taxes that the
commission has determined may be paid to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in section 39(b)(1) of
this chapter; or
(B) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units the
amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission.
SECTION 10. IC 36-7-14-56, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 183, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 56. (a) This section applies only to
a residential housing development program authorized by section 53 of
this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding section 39(a) of this chapter, with respect to the
allocation and distribution of property taxes for the accomplishment of
the purposes of a residential housing development program adopted
under section 53 of this chapter, "base assessed value" means the net
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


assessed value of all of the property, other than personal property, as
finally determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision, as adjusted under section
39(h) of this chapter.
(c) The allocation fund established under section 39(b) of this
chapter for the allocation area for a residential housing development
program adopted under section 53 of this chapter may be used only for
purposes related to the accomplishment of the purposes of the program,
including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The construction of any infrastructure (including streets,
roads, and sidewalks) or local public improvements in, serving,
or benefiting a residential housing development project.
(2) The acquisition of real property and interests in real property
for rehabilitation purposes within the allocation area.
(3) The preparation of real property in anticipation of
development of the real property within the allocation area.
(4) To do any of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds or any other
obligations payable from allocated tax proceeds in the
allocation area that are incurred by the redevelopment district
for the purpose of financing or refinancing the residential
housing development program established under section 53 of
this chapter for the allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
the allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in the allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 27 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
unit to pay for local public improvements that are physically
located in or physically connected to the allocation area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in the
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in the allocation area under section 25.2 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the unit for expenditures made by the unit for
local public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items described in section 25.1(a) of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


to the allocation area.
(d) Notwithstanding section 39(b) of this chapter, the commission
shall, relative to the allocation fund established under section 39(b) of
this chapter for an allocation area for a residential housing
development program adopted under section 53 of this chapter, do the
following before June 15 of each year:
(1) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value of
the taxable property in the allocation area for the most recent
assessment date minus the base assessed value, when multiplied
by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will exceed the
amount of assessed value needed to produce the property taxes
necessary to:
(A) make the distribution required under section 39(b)(2) and
39(b)(3) of this chapter;
(B) make, when due, principal and interest payments on bonds
described in section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter;
(C) pay the amount necessary for other purposes described in
section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter; and
(D) reimburse the county or municipality for anticipated
expenditures described in subsection (c)(2).
(2) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal body
of the county or municipality that established the department of
redevelopment, the officers who are authorized to fix budgets, tax
rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other
taxing units that are wholly or partly located within the allocation
area, and (in an electronic format) the department of local
government finance. The notice must:
(A) state the amount, if any, of excess property taxes that the
commission has determined may be paid to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in section 39(b)(1) of
this chapter; or
(B) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units the
amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission.
(e) If the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred percent
(200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds:
(1) necessary to make, when due, principal and interest payments
on bonds described in section 39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter;
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


plus
(2) the amount necessary for other purposes described in section
39(b)(4) 39(b)(5) of this chapter;
the commission shall submit to the county or municipal legislative
body its determination of the excess assessed value that the
commission proposes to allocate to the respective taxing units in the
manner prescribed in subsection (d)(2). The county or municipal
legislative body may approve the commission's determination or
modify the amount of the excess assessed value that will be allocated
to the respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in subsection
(d)(2).
(f) An allocation area must terminate on the date the residential
housing development program is terminated as set forth in section
53(e) of this chapter.
SECTION 11. IC 36-7-14.5-12.5, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.156-2024, SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) This section
applies only to an authority in a county having a United States
government military base that is scheduled for closing or is completely
or partially inactive or closed.
(b) In order to accomplish the purposes set forth in section 11 of this
chapter, an authority may create an economic development area:
(1) by following the procedures set forth in IC 36-7-14-41 for the
establishment of an economic development area by a
redevelopment commission; and
(2) with the same effect as if the economic development area was
created by a redevelopment commission.
The area established under this section shall be established only in the
area where a United States government military base that is scheduled
for closing or is completely or partially inactive or closed is or was
located.
(c) In order to accomplish the purposes set forth in section 11 of this
chapter, an authority may do the following in a manner that serves an
economic development area created under this section:
(1) Acquire by purchase, exchange, gift, grant, condemnation, or
lease, or any combination of methods, any personal property or
interest in real property needed for the redevelopment of
economic development areas located within the corporate
boundaries of the unit.
(2) Hold, use, sell (by conveyance by deed, land sale contract, or
other instrument), exchange, lease, rent, or otherwise dispose of
property acquired for use in the redevelopment of economic
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


development areas on the terms and conditions that the authority
considers best for the unit and the unit's inhabitants.
(3) Sell, lease, or grant interests in all or part of the real property
acquired for redevelopment purposes to any other department of
the unit or to any other governmental agency for public ways,
levees, sewerage, parks, playgrounds, schools, and other public
purposes on any terms that may be agreed on.
(4) Clear real property acquired for redevelopment purposes.
(5) Repair and maintain structures acquired for redevelopment
purposes.
(6) Remodel, rebuild, enlarge, or make major structural
improvements on structures acquired for redevelopment purposes.
(7) Survey or examine any land to determine whether the land
should be included within an economic development area to be
acquired for redevelopment purposes and to determine the value
of that land.
(8) Appear before any other department or agency of the unit, or
before any other governmental agency in respect to any matter
affecting:
(A) real property acquired or being acquired for
redevelopment purposes; or
(B) any economic development area within the jurisdiction of
the authority.
(9) Institute or defend in the name of the unit any civil action, but
all actions against the authority must be brought in the circuit or
superior court of the county where the authority is located.
(10) Use any legal or equitable remedy that is necessary or
considered proper to protect and enforce the rights of and perform
the duties of the authority.
(11) Exercise the power of eminent domain in the name of and
within the corporate boundaries of the unit subject to the same
conditions and procedures that apply to the exercise of the power
of eminent domain by a redevelopment commission under
IC 36-7-14.
(12) Appoint an executive director, appraisers, real estate experts,
engineers, architects, surveyors, and attorneys.
(13) Appoint clerks, guards, laborers, and other employees the
authority considers advisable, except that those appointments
must be made in accordance with the merit system of the unit if
such a system exists.
(14) Prescribe the duties and regulate the compensation of
employees of the authority.
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(15) Provide a pension and retirement system for employees of
the authority by using the public employees' retirement fund or a
retirement plan approved by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(16) Discharge and appoint successors to employees of the
authority subject to subdivision (13).
(17) Rent offices for use of the department or authority, or accept
the use of offices furnished by the unit.
(18) Equip the offices of the authority with the necessary
furniture, furnishings, equipment, records, and supplies.
(19) Design, order, contract for, and construct, reconstruct,
improve, or renovate the following:
(A) Any local public improvement or structure that is
necessary for redevelopment purposes or economic
development within the corporate boundaries of the unit.
(B) Any structure that enhances development or economic
development.
(20) Contract for the construction, extension, or improvement of
pedestrian skyways (as defined in IC 36-7-14-12.2(c)).
(21) Accept loans, grants, and other forms of financial assistance
from, or contract with, the federal government, the state
government, a municipal corporation, a special taxing district, a
foundation, or any other source.
(22) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary
or incidental to the performance of the duties of the authority and
the execution of the powers of the authority under this chapter.
(23) Take any action necessary to implement the purpose of the
authority.
(24) Provide financial assistance, in the manner that best serves
the purposes set forth in section 11 of this chapter, including
grants and loans, to enable private enterprise to develop,
redevelop, and reuse military base property or otherwise enable
private enterprise to provide social and economic benefits to the
citizens of the unit.
(d) An authority may designate all or a portion of an economic
development area created under this section as an allocation area by
following the procedures set forth in IC 36-7-14-39 for the
establishment of an allocation area by a redevelopment commission.
The allocation provision may modify the definition of "property taxes"
under IC 36-7-14-39(a) to include taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on the
depreciable personal property located and taxable on the site of
operations of designated taxpayers in accordance with the procedures
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


applicable to a commission under IC 36-7-14-39.3. IC 36-7-14-39.3
applies to such a modification. An allocation area established by an
authority under this section is a special taxing district authorized by the
general assembly to enable the unit to provide special benefits to
taxpayers in the allocation area by promoting economic development
that is of public use and benefit. For allocation areas established for an
economic development area created under this section after June 30,
1997, and to the expanded portion of an allocation area for an
economic development area that was established before June 30, 1997,
and that is expanded under this section after June 30, 1997, the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential property under
the rules of the department of local government finance, as finally
determined for any assessment date, must be allocated. All of the
provisions of IC 36-7-14-39 apply to an allocation area created under
this section, except that the authority shall be vested with the rights and
duties of a commission as referenced in those sections, except that the
expiration date of any allocation provision for the allocation area is the
later of July 1, 2016, or the expiration date determined under
IC 36-7-14-39(b), and except that, notwithstanding
IC 36-7-14-39(b)(4), IC 36-7-14-39(b)(5), property tax proceeds paid
into the allocation fund may be used by the authority only to do one (1)
or more of the following:
(1) Pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium on
any obligations incurred by the special taxing district or any other
entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing military base
reuse activities in or serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(2) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
obligations payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds
in that allocation area or from other revenues of the authority
(including lease rental revenues).
(3) Make payments on leases payable solely or in part from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area.
(4) Reimburse any other governmental body for expenditures
made by it that benefits or provides for local public improvements
or structures in or serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(5) Pay expenses incurred by the authority that benefit or provide
for local public improvements or structures that are in the
allocation area or serving or benefiting the allocation area. For
purposes of paying expenses incurred by the authority under this
subsection, the expiration date of an allocation area may be
extended to January 15, 2050, by resolution of the county fiscal
body.
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


(6) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses incurred in
training employees of industrial facilities that are located:
(A) in the allocation area; and
(B) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in any
year may not exceed the total amount of money in the allocation
fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the industrial
facilities described in clause (B). The reimbursements under this
subdivision must be made within three (3) years after the date on
which the investments that are the basis for the increment
financing are made.
(e) In addition to other methods of raising money for property
acquisition, redevelopment, or economic development activities in or
directly serving or benefiting an economic development area created
by an authority under this section, and in anticipation of the taxes
allocated under subsection (d), other revenues of the authority, or any
combination of these sources, the authority may, by resolution, issue
the bonds of the special taxing district in the name of the unit. Bonds
issued under this section may be issued in any amount without
limitation. The following apply if such a resolution is adopted:
(1) The authority shall certify a copy of the resolution authorizing
the bonds to the municipal or county fiscal officer, who shall then
prepare the bonds. The seal of the unit must be impressed on the
bonds, or a facsimile of the seal must be printed on the bonds.
(2) The bonds must be executed by the appropriate officer of the
unit and attested by the unit's fiscal officer.
(3) The bonds are exempt from taxation for all purposes.
(4) Bonds issued under this section may be sold at public sale in
accordance with IC 5-1-11 or at a negotiated sale.
(5) The bonds are not a corporate obligation of the unit but are an
indebtedness of the taxing district. The bonds and interest are
payable, as set forth in the bond resolution of the authority:
(A) from the tax proceeds allocated under subsection (d);
(B) from other revenues available to the authority; or
(C) from a combination of the methods stated in clauses (A)
and (B).
(6) Proceeds from the sale of bonds may be used to pay the cost
of interest on the bonds for a period not to exceed five (5) years
from the date of issuance.
(7) Laws relating to the filing of petitions requesting the issuance
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


of bonds and the right of taxpayers and voters to remonstrate
against the issuance of bonds do not apply to bonds issued under
this section.
(8) If a debt service reserve is created from the proceeds of bonds,
the debt service reserve may be used to pay principal and interest
on the bonds as provided in the bond resolution.
(9) If bonds are issued under this chapter that are payable solely
or in part from revenues to the authority from a project or
projects, the authority may adopt a resolution or trust indenture or
enter into covenants as is customary in the issuance of revenue
bonds. The resolution or trust indenture may pledge or assign the
revenues from the project or projects. The resolution or trust
indenture may also contain any provisions for protecting and
enforcing the rights and remedies of the bond owners as may be
reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including
covenants setting forth the duties of the authority. The authority
may establish fees and charges for the use of any project and
covenant with the owners of any bonds to set those fees and
charges at a rate sufficient to protect the interest of the owners of
the bonds. Any revenue bonds issued by the authority that are
payable solely from revenues of the authority shall contain a
statement to that effect in the form of bond.
(f) Notwithstanding section 8(a) of this chapter, an ordinance
adopted under section 11 of this chapter may provide, or be amended
to provide, that the board of directors of the authority shall be
composed of not fewer than three (3) nor more than eleven (11)
members, who must be residents of or be employed at a place of
employment located within the unit. The members shall be appointed
by the executive of the unit.
(g) The acquisition of real and personal property by an authority
under this section is not subject to the provisions of IC 5-22,
IC 36-1-10.5, IC 36-7-14-19, or any other statutes governing the
purchase of property by public bodies or their agencies.
(h) An authority may negotiate for the sale, lease, or other
disposition of real and personal property without complying with the
provisions of IC 5-22-22, IC 36-1-11, IC 36-7-14-22, or any other
statute governing the disposition of public property.
(i) Notwithstanding any other law, utility services provided within
an economic development area established under this section are
subject to regulation by the appropriate regulatory agencies unless the
utility service is provided by a utility that provides utility service solely
within the geographic boundaries of an existing or a closed military
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125


installation, in which case the utility service is not subject to regulation
for purposes of rate making, regulation, service delivery, or issuance of
bonds or other forms of indebtedness. However, this exemption from
regulation does not apply to utility service if the service is generated,
treated, or produced outside the boundaries of the existing or closed
military installation.
2026 IN 1244—LS 6938/DI 125